Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.130

Expense of monument.

Personal representatives of the estate of any deceased person are hereby authorized to expend a reasonable amount out of the estate of the decedent to erect a monument or tombstone suitable to mark the grave or crypt of the said decedent, and the expense thereof shall be paid as the funeral expenses are paid.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.76.130. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 175; RRS s 1545; prior: Code 1881 s 1555; 1875 p 127 s 1.]